California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26306.

An agreement shall provide for collection of all applicable taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26307.

The Governor is exempt from the rulemaking procedures and requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) when entering into agreements or amendments to agreements, provided that prior to execution of an agreement or amendment to an agreement, the Governor shall do both of the following: 

(a) Submit the proposed agreement or amendment to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for review and comment. The committee shall have 60 days to review the proposed agreement or amendment and to submit written recommendations to the Governor. The committee shall only submit a recommendation
 to the Governor if a majority of the members agree to that recommendation. The Governor shall consider all recommendations submitted by the committee and may revise the proposed agreement or amendment to incorporate the recommendations. If the Governor does not incorporate any recommendation submitted by the committee, the Governor shall set forth, in writing, the reasons for not incorporating that recommendation.

(b) Post the proposed agreement or amendment on the department’s internet website for public comment for 30 days. The comments received shall be considered by the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26308.

(a) An agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter shall not take effect unless one of the following occurs:

(1) Federal law is amended to allow for the interstate transfer of cannabis or cannabis products between authorized commercial cannabis businesses.

(2) Federal law is enacted that specifically prohibits the expenditure of federal funds to prevent the interstate transfer of cannabis or cannabis products between authorized commercial cannabis businesses.

(3) The United States Department of Justice issues an opinion or memorandum allowing
 or tolerating the interstate transfer of cannabis or cannabis products between authorized commercial cannabis businesses.

(4) The Attorney General issues a written opinion, through the process established pursuant to Section 12519 of the Government Code, that state law
 authorization, under an agreement pursuant to this chapter, for medicinal or adult-use commercial cannabis activity, or both, between foreign licensees and state licensees will not result in significant legal risk to the State of California under the federal Controlled Substances Act, based on review of applicable law, including federal judicial decisions and administrative actions.

(b) The department shall notify the Governor and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature upon the occurrence of an event described in subdivision (a), and shall post the notification on the department’s internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 3.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 26. Medicinal Cannabis Patients’ Right of Access Act [26320. - 26325.]

26320.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Access to medicinal cannabis is an integral aspect of access to health care, and eliminating barriers to medicinal cannabis access is essential to promoting and preserving the health of Californians for whom physicians have recommended the use of cannabis or cannabis products.

(b) It is the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature to ensure that Californians throughout the state have timely and
 convenient access to safe, effective, and affordable medicinal cannabis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 395, Sec. 2.   (SB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26321.

(a) This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Medicinal Cannabis Patients’ Right of Access Act.

(b) For purposes of this chapter:

(1) “Medicinal cannabis” means medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products, as those terms are defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (ai) of Section 26001.

(2) “Medicinal cannabis business” means a retailer authorized to engage
 in the retail sale by delivery of medicinal cannabis to medicinal cannabis patients pursuant to an M-license.

(3) “Medicinal cannabis patient” means a qualified patient, as defined in Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code, who possesses a physician’s recommendation that complies with Article 25 (commencing with Section 2525) of Chapter 5 of Division 2, or a qualified patient or primary caregiver for a qualified patient issued a valid identification card pursuant to Section 11362.71 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Regulation” means a local ordinance, regulation, policy, or practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 395, Sec. 2.   (SB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26322.

(a) A local jurisdiction shall not adopt or enforce any regulation that prohibits the retail sale by delivery within the local jurisdiction of medicinal cannabis to medicinal cannabis patients or their primary caregivers, or that otherwise has the effect of prohibiting the retail sale by delivery within the local jurisdiction of medicinal cannabis to medicinal cannabis patients or their primary caregivers by licensed medicinal cannabis businesses in a timely and readily accessible manner, and in types and quantities that are sufficient to meet demand from
 medicinal cannabis patients within the local jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, regulation of any of the following that has the effect of prohibiting the retail sale by delivery of medicinal cannabis:

(1) The number of medicinal cannabis businesses authorized to
 deliver medicinal cannabis in the local jurisdiction.

(2) The operating hours of medicinal cannabis businesses.

(3) The number or frequency of sales by delivery of medicinal cannabis.

(4) The types or quantities of medicinal cannabis authorized to be sold by delivery.

(5) The establishment of physical premises from which retail sale by delivery of medicinal cannabis within the jurisdiction is conducted by a licensed nonstorefront retailer, except that this paragraph shall not be construed to
 require the establishment of additional physical premises in a local jurisdiction that allowed medicinal cannabis retail as of January 1, 2022, and in which at least one physical premises engaged in the retail sale of medicinal cannabis, whether storefront or delivery, is already established.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the adoption or enforcement of reasonable regulations on retail sale by delivery of medicinal cannabis, including, but not limited to, reasonable regulations related to:

(1) Zoning requirements that are not inconsistent with subdivision (a). If compliance with subdivision (a) would otherwise require a local jurisdiction to authorize a physical premises from which retail sale by delivery of medicinal cannabis within the jurisdiction is
 conducted, this paragraph shall not be construed to alter that requirement.

(2) Security or public health and safety requirements.

(3) Licensing requirements.

(4) The imposition, collection, and remittance of any applicable state or local taxes upon retail sales occurring within the local jurisdiction.

(5) Regulations consistent with requirements or restrictions imposed on cannabis businesses by this division or regulations issued under this division.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the ability of a local jurisdiction to adopt or enforce any
 regulations on commercial cannabis operations other than retail sale by delivery of medicinal cannabis in the local jurisdiction.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 395, Sec. 2.   (SB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26323.

(a) This chapter may be enforced by an action brought pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure by any of the following parties, who shall be beneficially interested within the meaning of Section 1086 of the Code of Civil Procedure:

(1) A medicinal cannabis patient or their primary caregiver who seeks to purchase medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products within the local jurisdiction.

(2) A medicinal cannabis business that seeks to offer medicinal cannabis for sale within the local jurisdiction.

(3) The Attorney General.

(4) Any other party otherwise authorized by law.

(b) This section shall not be construed to limit the availability of any other remedy otherwise available to enforce this chapter. The existence of any other remedy shall not restrict the availability of relief to enforce this chapter under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 395, Sec. 2.   (SB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26324.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the ability or right of a local jurisdiction to regulate adult-use cannabis pursuant to Section 26200.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 395, Sec. 2.   (SB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26325.

This chapter addresses a matter of statewide concern and not a municipal affair, as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 395, Sec. 2.   (SB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

